Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1047.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CHANGE THE OUTCOME.new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for a grant to Change the Outcome, a nonprofit organization, to provide: new text end new text begin (1) data-centered learning opportunities on the dangers of opioid use in middle and high schools and communities in Minnesota; new text end new text begin (2) instruction on prevention strategies, assessing personal risk, and how to recognize overdose; new text end new text begin (3) information on emerging drug trends, including but not limited to fentanyl, xylazine, and pressed pills; and new text end new text begin (4) access to resources, including support for those struggling with substance use disorders. new text end